Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2507.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 following:* * *(16.2) Article XIX-L.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-LINTERNSHIP TAX CREDIT PROGRAMSection 1901-L. Scope of article.This article relates to the Internship Tax Credit Program.Section 1902-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicable taxes." Any of the taxes due under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX or XV or a tax under Article XVI of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Business firm." An entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth and subject to taxes imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX or XV."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A rural regional college established under Article XIX-G of the Public School Code of 1949.(3) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A of the Public School Code of 1949.20260HB2507PN3393 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A State-related institution as defined in section 2001-C of the Public School Code of 1949.(5) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.(6) An accredited private or independent college or university.(7) A private licensed school as defined in section 2 of the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act."Qualified business." A business that:(1) operates primarily in this Commonwealth;(2) has been continuously operating for at least three years; and(3) is a small business as defined in section 1702-B."Qualified intern." An individual who:(1) has completed at least 30 credit hours at an institution of higher education;(2) is a resident of this Commonwealth; and(3) has a minimum of a 2.5 grade point average on a 4.0 scale."Qualified internship." A structured program that:(1) provides work experience or school credit for students in their desired field;(2) pays at least minimum wage; and(3) is at least six weeks in length at an average of 20 hours per week.Section 1903-L. Internship Tax Credit.(a) Credit.--For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, a qualified business may claim the internship tax credit in the taxable year in which the business employed a qualified intern for a qualified internship and may apply the tax credit 20260HB2507PN3393 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 against the qualified business's applicable taxes.(b) Application.-- A qualified business applying to claim an internship tax credit must complete and submit to the department an internship tax credit application on a form and in a manner as determined by the department. The form shall require the qualified business to provide the following:(1) The names and student identification numbers or the last four digits of the Social Security numbers of all qualified interns for which the business is claiming the tax credit.(2) Proof that an employee is a qualified intern, which may be verified through providing a transcript or enrollment verification letter along with a grade point average from an institution of higher education in this Commonwealth.(3) Objectives of a qualified internship that develops the intern's skills in the intern's chosen career field.(c) Waiting list.--The department shall maintain a waiting list consisting of each business firm that chooses to be included on the list and whose application has not been approved because all available tax credits have been awarded. A business firm that was not awarded a tax credit due to a lack of available tax credits shall be notified of and offered a place on the waiting list. When tax credits become available, the department shall award the tax credits to the business firms in the order in which the business firms were placed on the waiting list.(d) Temporary increase in maximum tax credit available.--(1) The following shall apply if all tax credits authorized under this article have not been awarded as of October 1 of a fiscal year:20260HB2507PN3393 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) For applications accepted by the department from October 1 through November 30 of the fiscal year, the limitations under section 1905-L(e) shall not apply.(ii) The department may accept applications from October 1 through November 30 . A business firm, including a business firm that already applied for the maximum tax credits available under section 1905-L(e), may apply for up to the total amount of tax credits remaining available for total qualified interns employed during the tax year.(2) Prior to the award of tax credits applied for under paragraph (1), the department shall first award tax credits applied for by a business firm during the period October 1 through November 30 in an amount no greater than the maximum amount of tax credits for which a business firm is eligible under section 1905-L(e).Section 1904-L. Carryover, carryback, refund and assignment of credit.(a) Carryover, carryback and refund.--A qualified business is not entitled to carry forward, carry back or obtain a refund of all or a portion of an unused tax credit granted to the qualified business under this article.(b) Sale or assignment of tax credit.--A qualified business may not sell or assign a tax credit granted to the qualified business under this article.Section 1905-L. Regulations.(a) Promulgation.--The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article.(b) Guidelines.--The department shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this article. The 20260HB2507PN3393 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 guidelines shall be in effect until the department promulgates regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this article.(c) Statewide credit cap.--The total amount of tax credits given to business firms under this article may not exceed $2,500,000 per fiscal year.(d) Restriction on applicability of credits.--No credit granted under this article may be applied against a tax withheld by an employer from an employee under Article III.(e) Limitation on total tax credit claimed by a qualified business.--(1) The tax credit shall not exceed $2,000 per qualified intern.(2) The tax credit shall not exceed $10,000 total per tax year.Section 1906-L. Tax compliance.The provisions of Article XVII-A.1 apply to the application of this article.Section 1907-L. Applicability.(a) Taxable year.--The provisions of this article shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.(b) Expiration of tax credit.--The department may not approve a tax credit under this article for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2032.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2507PN3393 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425